Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-6,123
Population Health Information Act; act, how cited.

Sections 81-6,123 to 81-6,128 shall be known and may be cited as the Population Health Information Act.

Laws 2020, LB1183, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB967, § 10.
July 18, 2026